Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1004 Educational accountability
system; annual reports. (a) The department shall implement a
comprehensive system of educational accountability to motivate and support the
improved performance of students and the education system. This accountability
system shall:

(1) Include student accountability; school or
collective accountability; individual professional accountability for teachers,
principals, and other employees; and public accounting to parents, community
members, businesses, higher education, media, and political leadership;

(2) Link authority and resources to responsibility;

(3) Define clear roles for all parties and lines of
responsibility and mutual obligation and develop a collaborative process with
stakeholders, including representatives of appropriate bargaining units,
parents, administration, and students;

(4) Assess and track measures of academic
achievement, safety and well-being, and civic responsibility of individual
students at selected grade levels and report trend data on these measures over
time annually;

(5) Invoke a full and balanced set of appropriate
consequences for observed performance, including rewards and recognition for
those schools that meet or exceed their goals, assistance to those that fall
short, and sanctions for those that, given adequate assistance and ample time,
continue to fail to meet goals;

(6) Involve an annual statewide assessment program
that provides a report card containing trend data on school, school complex,
and system performance at selected benchmark grade levels with performance
indicators in areas relating to student achievement, safety and well-being, and
civic responsibility. These performance indicators shall include but not be
limited to:

(A) Student performance relative to statewide
content and performance standards; and

(B) School attendance and dropout rates;

(7) Require that teachers and administrators engage
in the continuous professional growth and development that ensure their
currency with respect to disciplinary content, leadership skill, knowledge, or
pedagogical skill, as appropriate to their position. This requirement may be
established by the department in terms of credit hours earned or their
equivalent in professional development activity certified by the department as
appropriate in focus and rigor;

(8) Establish an explicit link between professional
evaluation results and individual accountability through professional
development of the knowledge, skill, and professional behavior necessary to the
position, by requiring that results of the professional evaluation be used by
the department to prescribe professional development focus and content, as
appropriate;

(9) Include an annual statewide fiscal accountability
program, which includes a published report card that contains trend data on
school, school complex, and systemwide plans and results, including:

(A) Amounts allocated;

(B) Amounts expended;

(C) Amounts carried over; and

(D) Any significant changes to the budget,
with an explanation for the change;

(10) Include an evaluation of the effectiveness of
complex area superintendents and principals in supporting:

(A) Students' academic achievement, safety and
well-being, and civic responsibility; and

(B) The satisfaction of stakeholders affected
by the work of the complex area superintendents and principals, which may be
measured by broadbased surveys; and

(C) Fiscal accountability.

(b) The department shall annually post on the
department's website information on the specifics of the implementation of the
comprehensive accountability system, as well as the fiscal requirements and
legislative actions necessary to maintain and improve the accountability
system.

(c) The department shall also annually post on
its website information that includes but is not limited to the following:

(1) Results of school-by-school assessments of
educational outcomes;

(2) Summaries of each school's standards
implementation design;

(3) Summary descriptions of the demographic makeup of
the schools, with indications of the range of these conditions among schools
within Hawaii;

(4) Comparisons of conditions affecting Hawaii's
schools with the conditions of schools in other states;

(5) Other such assessments as may be deemed
appropriate by the board; and

(6) Any other reports required by this section.

(d) The department shall provide electronic
access to computer-based financial management, student information, and other
information systems to the legislature and the auditor. The department shall
submit to the legislature and to the governor, at least twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session, a school-by-school expenditure report
that includes but is not limited to the following:

(1) The financial analysis of expenditures by the
department with respect to the following areas:

(A) Instruction, including face-to-face
teaching, and classroom materials;

(B) Instructional support, including pupil,
teacher, and program support;

(C) Operations, including non-instructional
pupil services, facilities, and business services;

(D) Other commitments, including
contingencies, capital improvement projects, out-of-district obligations, and
legal obligations; and

(E) Leadership, including school management,
program and operations management, and district management; and

(2) The measures of accuracy, efficiency, and
productivity of the department, districts, and schools in delivering resources
to the classroom and the student.

(e) The superintendent of education is
responsible for the development and implementation of an educational
accountability system. The system shall include consequences and shall be
designed through a collaborative process involving stakeholders that shall
include parents, community members, the respective exclusive representatives, as
well as others deemed appropriate by the superintendent.

For the purposes of this section, negotiations
under chapter 89 shall be between the superintendent or the superintendent's
designee and the respective exclusive representative, and shall be limited to
the impact on personnel arising from the superintendent's decision in
implementing the educational accountability system. After the initial
agreement is negotiated, provisions on the impact of the accountability on
personnel may be reopened only upon mutual agreement of the parties. [L 1996, c
89, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 74, §2 and c 199, §2; am L 2000, c 238, §1; am L
2004, c 51, §56; am L 2014, c 232, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next